Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3 Y 368
SFX 3    0       tzetako      .
SFX 3    0       tzeko/700      .
SFX 3    0       tzearen/703      .
SFX 3    0       tuon/688      .
SFX 3    0       arazte      .
SFX 3    0       tzeren/703      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrentzat      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrei      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrarentzat      .
SFX 3    0       tutxorantz      .
SFX 3    0       tuegitara      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrei      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxori      .
SFX 3    0       tutxootaz      .
SFX 3    0       tuotarantz      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxootaz      .
SFX 3    0       turen/703      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrek      .
SFX 3    0       tuetako      .
SFX 3    0       araztear      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrek      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarraz      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoegi      .
SFX 3    0       tuegietaraino      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrera      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarraz      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoraino      .
SFX 3    0       tuaren/703      .
SFX 3    0       tuegitarantz      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarren      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoontzat      .
SFX 3    0       tuen/696      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarren      .
SFX 3    0       tzeekin      .
SFX 3    0       turegatik      .
SFX 3    0       tutxogatik      .
SFX 3    0       tzeregatik      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoak      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiotaz      .
SFX 3    0       tua      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoa      .
SFX 3    0       tzeon/705      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarraren      .
SFX 3    0       tuegira      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoan      .
SFX 3    0       tuegietarik      .
SFX 3    0       tzeotarik      .
SFX 3    0       tzeokiko      .
SFX 3    0       tukeran      .
SFX 3    0       tuari      .
SFX 3    0       tuegietara      .
SFX 3    0       tzeen/703      .
SFX 3    0       tuegitan      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrarekin      .
SFX 3    0       turik      .
SFX 3    0       tuegirekin      .
SFX 3    0       tzeetarat      .
SFX 3    0       tu      .
SFX 3    0       tuegietan      .
SFX 3    0       tutzartzat      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrik      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrik      .
SFX 3    0       tuk      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrerantz      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrez      .
SFX 3    0       tutxora      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiri      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrez      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxok      .
SFX 3    0       tuotarat      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoei      .
SFX 3    0       tzeotako      .
SFX 3    0       tutxookin      .
SFX 3    0       tuokiko      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxookin      .
SFX 3    0       tzeago      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrean      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoek      .
SFX 3    0       tzeotaraino      .
SFX 3    0       tuarekin      .
SFX 3    0       tuegi      .
SFX 3    0       tzetan      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrotaz      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoaz      .
SFX 3    0       tura      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiarentzat      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarretik      .
SFX 3    0       tuagan      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiak      .
SFX 3    0       tuagatik      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoen      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoago      .
SFX 3    0       araz      .
SFX 3    0       arazteke      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxotik      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxorendako      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoendako      .
SFX 3    0       tzerako      .
SFX 3    0       tutxori      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiokin      .
SFX 3    0       tuegirantz      .
SFX 3    0       tuegitarat      .
SFX 3    0       tuegian      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrari      .
SFX 3    0       tutxorendako      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoentzat      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrekin      .
SFX 3    0       tzearren      .
SFX 3    0       tuta      .
SFX 3    0       tzetatik      .
SFX 3    0       turi      .
SFX 3    0       tutzargatik      .
SFX 3    0       tuotan      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoak      .
SFX 3    0       tuegigatik      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrerantz      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzar      .
SFX 3    0       tuz      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoz      .
SFX 3    0       tzeetarik      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzat      .
SFX 3    0       tzera      .
SFX 3    0       tzegatiko      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoan      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoaren      .
SFX 3    0       tutara      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarroi      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiei      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarroi      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoez      .
SFX 3    0       tuak      .
SFX 3    0       tzeraino      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrok      .
SFX 3    0       tuotarik      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiek      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiendako      .
SFX 3    0       tuegitik      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrok      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoarendako      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiaz      .
SFX 3    0       tuan      .
SFX 3    0       ko      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrokin      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxo      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarron      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoarekin      .
SFX 3    0       tuetarat      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiaren      .
SFX 3    0       tuegien      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarron      .
SFX 3    0       tzeri      .
SFX 3    0       tzeetarantz      .
SFX 3    0       tuotaz      .
SFX 3    0       tuago      .
SFX 3    0       tuaganantz      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoei      .
SFX 3    0       tuotako      .
SFX 3    0       tutan      .
SFX 3    0       tuegitarik      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiekin      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrarendako      .
SFX 3    0       tzeagan      .
SFX 3    0       turaino      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoek      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoko      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoaz      .
SFX 3    0       tzetik      .
SFX 3    0       tzeak      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoen      .
SFX 3    0       tuegietarantz      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiontzat      .
SFX 3    0       arazi      .
SFX 3    0       tuei      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxorantz      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoaren      .
SFX 3    0       tuek      .
SFX 3    0       tzean      .
SFX 3    0       tutxotik      .
SFX 3    0       tuaz      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoontzat      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarroz      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiez      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarroz      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxorekin      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoarendako      .
SFX 3    0       tzea      .
SFX 3    0       tuegitako      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarretik      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarra      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxooi      .
SFX 3    0       tutatik      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoekin      .
SFX 3    0       tzear      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarraren      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxogatik      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoekin      .
SFX 3    0       tzerekiko      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxook      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarreko      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxorentzat      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoentzat      .
SFX 3    0       tzerainoko      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrekin      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoon      .
SFX 3    0       tuetarik      .
SFX 3    0       tzeei      .
SFX 3    0       tutaraino      .
SFX 3    0       tutxorentzat      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoez      .
SFX 3    0       tuokin      .
SFX 3    0       tugatiko      .
SFX 3    0       tzetaraino      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarri      .
SFX 3    0       tzeek      .
SFX 3    0       tzeaganaino      .
SFX 3    0       tutxo      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiko      .
SFX 3    0       tzek      .
SFX 3    0       tzeaz      .
SFX 3    0       tzeagana      .
SFX 3    0       tuegietako      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzartzat      .
SFX 3    0       tuez      .
SFX 3    0       tuetan      .
SFX 3    0       tzeotarantz      .
SFX 3    0       tzen      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrera      .
SFX 3    0       tuegietatik      .
SFX 3    0       tzeotatik      .
SFX 3    0       tzeotan      .
SFX 3    0       tzeetara      .
SFX 3    0       tutik      .
SFX 3    0       tzerekin      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoko      .
SFX 3    0       tuegioi      .
SFX 3    0       tuegientzat      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxooz      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoarentzat      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiok      .
SFX 3    0       tzetara      .
SFX 3    0       tuarekiko      .
SFX 3    0       tzearekiko      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrerat      .
SFX 3    0       tuko      .
SFX 3    0       tuetaraino      .
SFX 3    0       tuegion      .
SFX 3    0       tuetara      .
SFX 3    0       tzeke      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzargatik      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxorat      .
SFX 3    0       tzeez      .
SFX 3    0       tzez      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrarentzat      .
SFX 3    0       tutxooi      .
SFX 3    0       tzenago      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrendako      .
SFX 3    0       tzeotaz      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarra      .
SFX 3    0       tutxook      .
SFX 3    0       tzerantz      .
SFX 3    0       tzetarat      .
SFX 3    0       turekiko      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoraino      .
SFX 3    0       tutxotzat      .
SFX 3    0       arazten      .
SFX 3    0       tzezko      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxotzat      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrean      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoon      .
SFX 3    0       tuotaraino      .
SFX 3    0       tuoi      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiarekin      .
SFX 3    0       turiko      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoren      .
SFX 3    0       tuok      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoarentzat      .
SFX 3    0       tuegitaraino      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoarekin      .
SFX 3    0       tuegioz      .
SFX 3    0       tzegatik      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarri      .
SFX 3    0       tutako      .
SFX 3    0       tuegitzat      .
SFX 3    0       tuagana      .
SFX 3    0       tuegirendako      .
SFX 3    0       tzeetatik      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrari      .
SFX 3    0       tuegirat      .
SFX 3    0       turantz      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrontzat      .
SFX 3    0       tze      .
SFX 3    0       tzeotara      .
SFX 3    0       tuotatik      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrendako      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxoari      .
SFX 3    0       turekin      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrarendako      .
SFX 3    0       tzeoi      .
SFX 3    0       tutxooz      .
SFX 3    0       tuekin      .
SFX 3    0       tzetiko      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxorik      .
SFX 3    0       tugatik      .
SFX 3    0       tzeok      .
SFX 3    0       tzeekiko      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoa      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiren      .
SFX 3    0       tuegia      .
SFX 3    0       tzeokin      .
SFX 3    0       tzerat      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarreraino      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarregi      .
SFX 3    0       tuoz      .
SFX 3    0       tuegitatik      .
SFX 3    0       tzetarik      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrotaz      .
SFX 3    0       tzeetan      .
SFX 3    0       tutxorat      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrontzat      .
SFX 3    0       tutarantz      .
SFX 3    0       tzetarantz      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrerat      .
SFX 3    0       tzearekin      .
SFX 3    0       tutarat      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiari      .
SFX 3    0       tuagandik      .
SFX 3    0       tzeagandik      .
SFX 3    0       tzeaganantz      .
SFX 3    0       tutxok      .
SFX 3    0       tuegik      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiraino      .
SFX 3    0       tuegirik      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoren      .
SFX 3    0       tzeoz      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrentzat      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarreraino      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrak      .
SFX 3    0       tutxorekin      .
SFX 3    0       tuetatik      .
SFX 3    0       tzetzarrak      .
SFX 3    0       tzeari      .
SFX 3    0       tuegiarendako      .
SFX 3    0       tuotara      .
SFX 3    0       tzerik      .
SFX 3    0       tuegietarat      .
SFX 3    0       tzeotarat      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarreko      .
SFX 3    0       tzetxora      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrokin      .
SFX 3    0       tutzarrago      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoari      .
SFX 3    0       tuetarantz      .
SFX 3    0       tzeetako      .
SFX 3    0       turat      .
SFX 3    0       tuzko      .
SFX 3    0       tutzar      .
SFX 3    0       tutxoendako      .
